Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-133
Airports; license; requirement; approval of site; operation without license unlawful.

Any proposed airport or restricted landing area shall be first licensed by the division before such airport or area shall be used or operated. Any municipality or person acquiring property for the purpose of constructing or establishing an airport or restricted landing area shall, prior to such acquisition, make application to the division for a certificate of approval of the site selected and the general purpose or purposes for which the property is to be acquired, to insure that the property and its use shall conform to minimum standards of safety and shall serve the public interest. It shall be unlawful for any municipality or officer or employee thereof, or for any person, to operate an airport or restricted landing area for which a license has not been issued by the division.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(6), p. 93;

Laws 2002, LB 446, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 28.

A county should not be able to thwart the strong interest of the state in the promotion of aviation through the medium of its zoning authority. Seward County Board of Commissioners v. City of Seward, 196 Neb. 266, 242 N.W.2d 849 (1976).

The Revised Airports Act required the licensing of airports and restricted landing areas except restricted landing areas designed for personal use. Bruns v. City of Seward, 186 Neb. 658, 185 N.W.2d 853 (1971).